Arkansas, session 2025, SB306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Home- and community-based services waiver for aging and
elderly populations.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1)(A) The waivers within the state Medicaid programs for home-
and community-based services were first established by Section 2176 of the
Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981, Pub. L. No. 97-35, and were
incorporated into the United States Code at section 1915(c) of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.
(B) The waivers for home- and community-based services
allow states to provide state Medicaid services to targeted populations to
avoid institutionalization by receiving comparable services in their homes or
*JMB334*
02/24/2025 4:52:01 PM JMB334

SB306
communities;
(2)(A) The Arkansas Medicaid Program currently administers two
(2) home- and community-based services under the authority of section 1915(c)
of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., for Medicaid
beneficiaries who are elderly or aging.
(B) The Arkansas Medicaid Program has not designated a
comprehensive and integrated strategy to support the quickly increasing
numbers of Arkansans needing services due to aging or elderly needs;
(3)(A) Skilled nursing facilities have always had a place in a
comprehensive approach to supporting the aging and elderly population.
(B) However, home- and community-based services are not
adequately meeting the needs of Arkansans to allow the population to age in
their homes or communities before the need for a skilled nursing facility;
(4) Cost neutrality is a requirement under section 1915(c) of
the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., meaning that the average
per participant cost for home- and community-based services must be no more
costly than the average per person cost at a skilled nursing facility;
(5) However, a wide gap currently resides in both cost and
service array resulting in no true alternative for a Medicaid beneficiary to
receive care in his or her home or community before a skilled nursing
facility is required;
(6) For the fiscal year 2024, the average participant cost for a
skilled nursing facility was approximately one hundred two thousand four
hundred eighty-two dollars ($102,482); and
(7) The Arkansas Medicaid Program is not operating at cost
neutrality for Medicaid beneficiaries who are aging or elderly without
appropriate waivers under section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act, 42
U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall apply for a waiver under
the authority of section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396
et seq., for aging and elderly populations to allow Medicaid beneficiaries to
have an alternative to skilled nursing facility care.
(c) The department shall ensure that the average per capita
expenditures estimated in a fiscal year for home- and community-based
services waiver recipients does not exceed the average per capita expenditure
that would have been made to provide institutional services for recipients in
02/24/2025 4:52:01 PM JMB334

SB306
the absence of the wavier.



































02/24/2025 4:52:01 PM JMB334